test/src/morphology/V-avata_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - avata: # Verb 'to open / avata' - full paradigm
     avata+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: avuan
     avata+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: avuat
     avata+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: avuau
     avata+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: avuammo
     avata+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: avuatto
     avata+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: avatah
     avata+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: avua
    
     avata+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: avain
     avata+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: avait
     avata+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: avai
     avata+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: avaimmo
     avata+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: avaitto
     avata+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: avattih
     avata+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: avannuh
     avata+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3: avattu
